Alaska statutes. Title 4. Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 1. Licensing and Reporting Requirements.

Sec. 04.11.010.
License or permit required; presumption concerning possession for sale.

Except as provided in AS

04.11.020

, a person may not knowingly manufacture, sell, offer for sale, possess for sale or barter, traffic in, or barter an alcoholic beverage unless under license or permit issued under this title.

Except as provided in this subsection, a person may not solicit or receive orders for the delivery of an alcoholic beverage in an area that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491

. If the area has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)(1)

, (2), or (3), or (b)(1) or (2), a package store licensee outside of that local option area may receive orders as provided under AS

04.11.150

but may not solicit in that area or receive orders through an agent or employee in that area. This subsection does not apply to a package store licensee who operates a package store in an area that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)(2)(C)

or (3)(C) or (b)(2)(C). A person who violates this subsection is punishable upon conviction as provided under AS

04.16.200(a)

or (b).

Unless a municipality or established village has adopted a more restrictive local option under AS

04.11.491(g)

, in a criminal prosecution for possession of alcoholic beverages for sale in violation of (a) of this section, the fact that a person

possessed more than 10 1/2 liters of distilled spirits or 24 liters or more of wine, or either a half-keg of malt beverages or 12 gallons or more of malt beverages in individual containers in an area where the sale of alcoholic beverages is restricted or prohibited under AS

04.11.491

creates a presumption that the person possessed the alcoholic beverages for sale;

sends, transports, or brings more than 10 1/2 liters of distilled spirits or 24 liters or more of wine, or either a half-keg of malt beverages or 12 gallons or more of malt beverages in individual containers to an area where the sale of alcoholic beverages is restricted or prohibited under AS

04.11.491

creates a presumption that the person sent, transported, or brought the alcoholic beverages for sale in the area.

In this section,

“bring” has the meaning given in AS

04.11.499

;

“send” has the meaning given in AS

04.11.499

;

“transport” has the meaning given in AS 04.11.499.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 156 SLA 1988; am §§ 2, 3 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 124 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 2010)

Cross references. —

For penalties for a violation of this section, see
AS

04.16.200

.

Editor’s notes. —

Sec. 9, ch. 88, SLA 2010, provides that the 2010 amendment of (c) of this section applies “to an offense occurring on or after June 17, 2010”.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A “cooperative” that purchases alcoholic beverages for its members and charges them the actual cost of the purchase plus a percentage “to cover administrative and shipping costs” is required to obtain a license under this section. July 2, 1987 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.010.
License or permit required; presumption concerning possession for sale.

Except as provided in AS

04.11.020

, a person may not knowingly

possess for barter, traffic in, or barter an alcoholic beverage unless under license or permit issued under this title; or

manufacture an alcoholic beverage, sell an alcoholic beverage, offer an alcoholic beverage for sale, or possess an alcoholic beverage for sale in an area that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491

unless under license or permit issued under this title.

Except as provided in this subsection, a person may not solicit or receive orders for the delivery of an alcoholic beverage in an area that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491

. If the area has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)(1)

, (2), or (3) or (b)(1) or (2), a package store licensee outside of that local option area may receive orders as provided under a package store shipping endorsement under AS

04.09.460

but may not solicit in that area or receive orders through an agent or employee in that area. This subsection does not apply to a package store licensee who operates a package store in an area that has adopted a local option under AS

04.11.491(a)(2)(C)

or (3)(C) or (b)(2)(C). A person who violates this subsection is punishable upon conviction as provided under AS

04.16.200(a)

or (b).

Unless a municipality or established village has adopted a more restrictive local option under AS

04.11.491(g)

, in a criminal prosecution for possession of alcoholic beverages for barter or sale in violation of (a) of this section, AS

04.09.060

,

04.09.140

, or

04.09.850

, the fact that a person

possessed more than 10 1/2 liters of distilled spirits or 24 liters or more of wine, or either a half-barrel keg of brewed beverages or 12 gallons or more of brewed beverages in individual containers in an area where the sale of alcoholic beverages is restricted or prohibited under AS

04.11.491

creates a presumption that the person possessed the alcoholic beverages for barter or sale;

sends, transports, or brings more than 10 1/2 liters of distilled spirits or 24 liters or more of wine, or either a half-barrel keg of brewed beverages or 12 gallons or more of brewed beverages in individual containers to an area where the sale of alcoholic beverages is restricted or prohibited under AS

04.11.491

creates a presumption that the person sent, transported, or brought the alcoholic beverages for barter or sale in the area.

In this section,

“bring” has the meaning given in AS

04.11.499

;

“send” has the meaning given in AS

04.11.499

;

“transport” has the meaning given in AS 04.11.499.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 156 SLA 1988; am §§ 2, 3 ch 101 SLA 1995; am §§ 1, 2 ch 124 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 17 SLA 2006; am § 2 ch 25 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 2010; am § 14 – 16 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.015.
Purchase from nonlicensee prohibited.

A person may not purchase alcoholic beverages from a person who is not a licensee, permittee, or an agent or employee of a licensee or permittee.

A person who violates this section is guilty of a violation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 156 SLA 1988)

Sec. 04.11.015.
Purchase from nonlicensee prohibited.

A person may not purchase or barter for alcoholic beverages from a person who is not a licensee, permittee, or an agent or employee of a licensee or permittee.

A person who violates (a) of this section is guilty of a violation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 156 SLA 1988; am § 17 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.020.
Exceptions: License or permit not required.

A license or permit is not required to authorize sales made by a person under a judgment and decree of foreclosure, under the bankruptcy law of the United States, or under order of the board or a court under AS

04.16.220

.

A license or permit is not required to serve alcoholic beverages in exchange for valuable contributions at a private gathering of a bona fide group of co-workers or of a professional, social, or fraternal organization if equal contributions are made by all in attendance and only the amount required to purchase the alcoholic beverages is contributed. All other applicable provisions of this title and regulations under this title shall be observed at these private gatherings.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.11.030.
Death of licensee.

The executor or administrator of the estate of a person who was operating a business as a sole licensee under a license authorized by this title may continue to operate the licensed business until an application for transfer of a license to another person is approved or until the license is forfeited under (b) of this section.

If an application for the transfer of ownership of a license from a deceased licensee is not made within 90 days of the death of the licensee or within an additional 90 days if an application for transfer of ownership made by the executor is denied, or no petition is made to the board for an extension of time under (c) of this section within the time, the license is forfeited.

The board may extend the time limits in (b) of this section on petition of the executor or administrator.

This section does not authorize the transfer of a liquor license by an administrator or executor to the estate of a decedent.

The board may transfer a license to an executor or administrator only in the executor’s or administrator’s individual capacity.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Collateral references. —

45 Am. Jur. 2d, Intoxicating Liquors, § 150.

Sec. 04.11.030.
Death of licensee.

The executor or administrator of the estate of a person who was operating a business as a sole licensee under a license authorized by this title may continue to operate the licensed business until an application for transfer of a license to another person is approved or until the license is forfeited under (b) of this section.

If an application for the transfer of ownership of a license from a deceased licensee is not made within 180 days of the death of the licensee or within an additional 90 days if an application for transfer of ownership made by the executor is denied, or no petition is made to the board for an extension of time under (c) of this section within the time, the license is forfeited.

The board may extend the time limits in (b) of this section on petition of the executor or administrator.

This section does not authorize the transfer of a liquor license by an administrator or executor to the estate of a decedent.

The board may transfer a license to an executor or administrator only in the executor’s or administrator’s individual capacity.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 18 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.040.
Board approval of transfers.

A license issued under this title may not be transferred to another person except with the written consent of the board.

A license or permit issued under this title may not be transferred to a new location except with the written consent of the board.

A person may not receive or transfer controlling interest in a liquor license issued to a partnership, including a limited partnership, a limited liability organization, or a corporation under this title, except with the written consent of the board.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 74 SLA 1999)

Cross references. —

For application for transfer of a license to another person, see AS

04.11.280

; for application for transfer of license location, see AS

04.11.290

.

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Opinions of attorney general. —

If the federal Internal Revenue Service has purported to seize a liquor license, it may not operate the license or transfer it to another person without board approval. January 17, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 04.11.040.
Board approval of transfers.

A license issued under this title may not be transferred to another person except with the written consent of the board.

A license or permit issued under this title may not be transferred to a new location except with the written consent of the board.

A person may not receive or transfer controlling interest in a liquor license issued to a partnership, including a limited partnership, a limited liability organization, or a corporation under this title, except with the written consent of the board.

A person who transfers a license or permit or a controlling interest in a license or permit in violation of this section commits the offense of unauthorized transfer of an alcoholic beverage license or permit.

Unauthorized transfer of an alcoholic beverage license or permit is a violation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 2 ch 93 SLA 1985; am § 3 ch 74 SLA 1999; am § 19 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.045.
Reports required of limited liability organizations.

A limited liability organization licensed under this title shall report to the board when a member of the limited liability organization transfers 10 percent or more of the ownership of the organization and shall report a change of managers.

The report to the board shall be made in writing in duplicate and shall be sent within 10 days after the change in member interest or manager.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1999)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.045.
Reports required of limited liability organizations.

A limited liability organization licensed under this title shall report to the board when a member of the limited liability organization transfers 10 percent or more of the ownership of the organization and shall report a change of managers.

The report to the board shall be made in writing in duplicate and shall be sent within 10 days after the change in member interest or manager.

A limited liability organization that fails to report as required under (a) of this section commits the offense of failure to report a change in member interest or manager.

Failure to report a change in member interest or manager is a violation.

History.

(§ 4 ch 74 SLA 1999; am § 20 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.050.
Reports required of corporations.

A corporation issued a license under this title shall report to the board when 10 percent or more of its corporate stock is transferred and shall also report any change in its corporate officers or in the membership of its board of directors.

The report to the board shall be made in writing in duplicate and shall be sent within 10 days after the transfer of the stock or the change in officers or directors.

This section does not apply to a corporation whose stock is listed on a stock exchange, a corporation that is required by law to file periodic reports with the United States Securities Exchange Commission, or to a bank, trust company, financial institution, or title company to which a license is issued in a fiduciary capacity.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Administrative Code. —

For licensing, see 13 AAC 104, art. 2.

Sec. 04.11.050.
Reports required of corporations.

A corporation issued a license under this title shall report to the board when 10 percent or more of its corporate stock is transferred and shall also report any change in its corporate officers or in the membership of its board of directors.

The report to the board shall be made in writing in duplicate and shall be sent within 10 days after the transfer of the stock or the change in officers or directors.

This section does not apply to a corporation whose stock is listed on a stock exchange, a corporation that is required by law to file periodic reports with the United States Securities Exchange Commission, or to a bank, trust company, financial institution, or title company to which a license is issued in a fiduciary capacity.

A corporation that fails to report as required under (a) of this section, other than a corporation described in (c) of this section, commits the offense of failure to report a stock transfer or change of officers or board members.

Failure to report a stock transfer or change of officers or board members is a violation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 21 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.055.
Reports required of partnerships.

A partnership, including a limited partnership, issued a license under this title shall report to the board when a partnership interest of 10 percent or more is transferred and shall report a change of general partners.

The report to the board shall be made in writing in duplicate and shall be sent within 10 days after the change in interest or change of general partners.

History.

(§ 3 ch 93 SLA 1985)

Sec. 04.11.055.
Reports required of partnerships.

A partnership, including a limited partnership, issued a license under this title shall report to the board when a partnership interest of 10 percent or more is transferred and shall report a change of general partners.

The report to the board shall be made in writing in duplicate and shall be sent within 10 days after the change in interest or change of general partners.

A partnership that fails to report as required under (a) of this section commits the offense of failure to report a transfer of partnership interest or change of general partner.

Failure to report a transfer of partnership interest or change of general partner is a violation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 93 SLA 1985; am § 22 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.060.
Nonresident distiller, brewer, winery, or wholesaler.

A distiller, brewer, winery, or wholesaler whose plant or principal place of business is outside the state may not sell products directly to licensees in the state without

obtaining a general wholesale license under AS

04.11.160(a)

for each wholesale distributing point in the state;

appointing an agent upon whom process can be served; and

obtaining other applicable licenses under the provisions of this title.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980)

Sec. 04.11.060.
Nonresident distiller, brewer, winery, or wholesaler.

A distiller, brewer, winery, or wholesaler whose plant or principal place of business is outside the state may not sell products directly to licensees in the state without

obtaining a general wholesale license under AS

04.09.100

for each wholesale distributing point in the state;

appointing an agent upon whom process can be served; and

obtaining other applicable licenses under the provisions of this title.

(b)

A person who violates (a) of this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am §§ 23, 24 ch 8 SLA 2022)

Sec. 04.11.070.
Power limited to the board.

Only the board may issue, renew, transfer, relocate, suspend, or revoke a license under this title.

History.

(§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For delegation of authority to director, see AS

04.06.080

.

Sec. 04.11.070.
Power limited to the board.

History.

[§ 2 ch 131 SLA 1980; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 1986; Repealed, § 164 ch 8 SLA 2022.]